Wisconsin, session 2025, AB924.
do enact as follows:AB924,13Section 1. 16.9565 (2) (a) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 4121, is amended to read:AB924,1,8516.9565 (2) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), no state agency may own, 6operate, or lease an electric vehicle charging station containing a Level 1 charger, 7Level 2 charger, or Level 3 charger unless the charger is not available to the public 8and is used solely to charge vehicles owned or leased by a state agency.Note: Inserts the correct defined terms.AB924,21Section 2. 31.385 (2) (ad) 2m. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin 2Act 65, is amended to read:AB924,2,4331.385 (2) (ad) 2m. A project to remove a dam shall not be subject to the cost 4limits under subd. 1. 1m. a.Note: Inserts correct cross-reference. Section 31.385 (2) (ad) 1. was renumbered to s. 31.385 (2) (ad) 1m. a. by 2023 Wis. Act 65.AB924,35Section 3. 48.981 (3) (cm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB924,2,13648.981 (3) (cm) Contract with licensed child welfare agencies. A county 7department may contract with a licensed child welfare agency to fulfill the county 8department’s duties specified under par. (c) 1., 2. b., 2m. b., 5., 5r., 6., 6m., and 8. 9The department may contract with a licensed child welfare agency to fulfill the 10department’s duties specified under par. (c) 1., 2. a., 2m. b. a., 3., 4., 5., 5m., 5r., 6., 116m., 7., 8., and 9. in a county having a population of 750,000 or more. The 12confidentiality provisions specified in sub. (7) shall apply to any licensed child 13welfare agency with which a county department or the department contracts.Note: Inserts the correct cross-reference. Section 48.981 (3) (c) 2m. a. relates to investigations by a licensed child welfare agency that is under contract with the Department of Children and Families, while s. 48.981 (3) (c) 2m. b. relates to investigations by a licensed child welfare agency that is under contract with a county department of social or human services.AB924,414Section 4. 66.0442 (2) (a) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 15121, is amended to read:AB924,3,21666.0442 (2) (a) Except as provided in pars. (b) and (c), no local governmental 17unit may own, operate, manage, or lease an electric vehicle charging station 18containing a Level 1 charger, Level 2 charger, or Level 3 charger unless the charger 1is not available to the public and is used solely to charge vehicles owned or leased by 2the local governmental unit.Note: Inserts the correct defined terms.AB924,53Section 5. 66.0608 (2m) (b) 1. (intro.) of the statutes, as created by 2023 4Wisconsin Act 12, is amended to read:AB924,3,7566.0608 (2m) (b) 1. (intro.) Except as provided in par. (c) 1., a certification 6under par. (a) 1. shall include a statement that certifies that any of the following 7has been maintained at a level at least equivalent to the previous year:Note: Inserts a missing phrase. Section 66.0608 (2m) (a) 1. requires a certification, which “shall include a statement under par. (b) 1.”AB924,68Section 6. 66.0608 (2m) (b) 2. (intro.) of the statutes, as created by 2023 9Wisconsin Act 12, is amended to read:AB924,3,121066.0608 (2m) (b) 2. (intro.) Except as provided in par. (c) 1., a certification 11under par. (a) 2. shall include a statement that certifies that any 2 of the following 12have been maintained at a level at least equivalent to the previous year:Note: Inserts a missing phrase. Section 66.0608 (2m) (a) 2. requires a certification, which “shall include a statement under par. (b) 2.”AB924,713Section 7. 66.1105 (4e) (d) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB924,3,191466.1105 (4e) (d) 2. Notwithstanding the time limits for termination under 15sub. (7) (ak) to (at) (as), but subject to sub. (7) (a) and (b), a district may remain in 16existence for up to 10 years after the district would otherwise be required to 17terminate, if the district is designated as a distressed district under this subsection, 18or up to 40 years after the district is created, if the district is designated as a 19severely distressed district under this subsection.Note: Removes obsolete cross-reference. Section 66.1105 (7) (at) was repealed by 2023 Wis. Act 138.AB924,81Section 8. 66.1105 (4e) (d) 3. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB924,4,5266.1105 (4e) (d) 3. (intro.) Notwithstanding the time limits and other 3provisions for termination under sub. (7), a donor tax incremental district under 4sub. (6) (d), (dm), (e), and (f) may share tax increments with a distressed, or severely 5distressed, district until the earlier of the following occurs:Note: Removes obsolete cross-reference. Section 66.1105 (6) (dm) was repealed by 2023 Wis. Act 138.AB924,96Section 9. 66.1105 (4e) (e) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:AB924,4,7766.1105 (4e) (e) 5. Become a donor district under sub. (6) (d), (dm), (e), or (f).Note: Removes obsolete cross-reference. Section 66.1105 (6) (dm) was repealed by 2023 Wis. Act 138.AB924,108Section 10. 66.1105 (6) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB924,5,9966.1105 (6) (c) Except for tax increments allocated under par. (d), (dm), (e), (f), 10or (g), or erroneous reporting of value increments as described in par. (h), all tax 11increments received with respect to a tax incremental district shall, upon receipt by 12the city treasurer, be deposited into a special fund for that district. The city 13treasurer may deposit additional moneys into such fund pursuant to an 14appropriation by the common council. No moneys may be paid out of such fund 15except to pay project costs with respect to that district, to reimburse the city for 16such payments, to pay project costs of a district under par. (d), (dm), (e), (f), or (g), to 17pay property tax reimbursements as described under par. (h), or to satisfy claims of 18holders of bonds or notes issued with respect to such district. Subject to par. (d), 19(dm), (e), (f), or (g), moneys paid out of the fund to pay project costs with respect to 20a district may be paid out before or after the district is terminated under sub. (7). 21Subject to any agreement with bondholders, moneys in the fund may be temporarily 22invested in the same manner as other city funds if any investment earnings are 1applied to reduce project costs. After all project costs and all bonds and notes with 2respect to the district have been paid or the payment thereof provided for, subject to 3any agreement with bondholders, if there remain in the fund any moneys that are 4not allocated under par. (d), (dm), (e), (f), or (g), they shall be paid over to the 5treasurer of each county, school district or other tax levying municipality or to the 6general fund of the city in the amounts that belong to each respectively, having due 7regard for that portion of the moneys, if any, that represents tax increments not 8allocated to the city and that portion, if any, that represents voluntary deposits of 9the city into the fund.Note: Removes obsolete cross-references. Section 66.1105 (6) (dm) was repealed by 2023 Wis. Act 138.AB924,1110Section 11. 66.1105 (7) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB924,5,171166.1105 (7) (a) That time when the city has received aggregate tax increments 12with respect to the district in an amount equal to the aggregate of all project costs 13under the project plan and any amendments to the project plan for the district, 14except that this paragraph does not apply to a district whose positive tax 15increments have been allocated under sub. (6) (d), (dm), (e), or (f) until the district 16to which the allocation is made has paid off the aggregate of all of its project costs 17under its project plan.Note: Removes obsolete cross-reference. Section 66.1105 (6) (dm) was repealed by 2023 Wis. Act 138.AB924,1218Section 12. 66.1105 (18) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB924,5,211966.1105 (18) (c) 1. Notwithstanding the provisions under sub. (6) (d), (dm), (e), 20or (f), a multijurisdictional tax incremental district may not become a donor 21district, or receive tax increments from a donor district.Note: Removes obsolete cross-reference. Section 66.1105 (6) (dm) was repealed by 2023 Wis. Act 138.AB924,131Section 13. 66.1105 (20) (d) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB924,6,4266.1105 (20) (d) 2. No tax incremental district described under this 3subsection may allocate positive tax increments as provided under sub. (4e) or (6) 4(d), (dm), (e), or (f).Note: Removes obsolete cross-reference. Section 66.1105 (6) (dm) was repealed by 2023 Wis. Act 138.AB924,145Section 14. 70.075 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB924,6,12670.075 (3) To the end that all valuations throughout the city shall be made on 7a uniform basis, such board of assessors, under the direction and supervision of the 8city assessor, shall compare the valuations so secured, making all necessary 9corrections and all other just and necessary changes to arrive at the true value of 10property within the city. The city assessor may direct that all objections to 11valuations filed with the city assessor in writing, in the manner provided in s. 70.47 12(13) (16), shall be investigated by the board.Note: Inserts the correct cross-reference. 1979 Wis. Act 34 renumbered s. 70.47 (16) from s. 70.47 (13), but the cross-reference in s. 70.075 (3) was not changed.AB924,1513Section 15. 71.03 (6m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB924,6,171471.03 (6m) Time to file claims; no return required. A claim for a credit 15under s. 71.07 (3m) or subch. VIII or IX that is filed by a natural person who is not 16required to file a report under sub. (2) (a) shall be filed on a calendar year basis in 17conformity with the filing requirements in subs. (6) and (7).Note: Removes obsolete cross-reference. Section 71.07 (3m) was repealed effective 2-6-22 by 2021 Wis. Act 127.AB924,1618Section 16. 71.05 (6) (a) 17. of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab924 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab924 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB924 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB924 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB924: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting